Maryland, session 2025, HB1375.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
22–218.
(c) (1) A person may not drive or move on any highway any vehicle or
equipment that is equipped with or displays any light or signal device designed to emit an
oscillating, rotating, blinking, or other type of emission of light, unless designated and
authorized by the Administrator as indicated in paragraphs (2) through (13) of this
subsection. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the display and use of any lighting
device that may be permitted or required elsewhere in the Maryland Vehicle Law.
(6) (i) Service vehicles, waste or recycling collection vehicles, rural
letter carrier vehicles, slow moving farm vehicles, and tow trucks may be equipped with or
display yellow or amber lights or signal devices.
(ii) Highway maintenance and service equipment or vehicles owned
by the State or a local jurisdiction, or operating under a contract with the State or a local
jurisdiction, that are equipped with and displaying yellow or amber flashing lights while in
use for snow removal or the protection of highway maintenance workers may
– 1 –

Ch. 459 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
simultaneously be equipped with and display green flashing lights in a number up to the
number of yellow or amber flashing lights equipped and displayed.
(III) 1. A TOW TRUCK MAY DISPLAY A PORTABLE VARIABLE
MESSAGING SIGN MOUNTED ON THE TOW TRUCK WHILE AT THE SCENE OF AN
ACCIDENT A CRASH OR A DISABLED VEHICLE.
2. THE PORTABLE VARIABLE MESSAGING SIGN SHALL:
A. CONFORM TO THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED IN THE
MANUAL ON UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES ADOPTED BY THE STATE
HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION UNDER § 25–104 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
B. DISPLAY ONLY THOSE MESSAGES APPROVED FOR USE
BY THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION.
22–218.2.
(a) (1) One or more amber flashing lights may be displayed:
(i) By a tow truck while at the scene of an accident or a disabled
vehicle or while towing a vehicle; and
(ii) By snow removal and other highway maintenance and service
equipment and escort vehicles.
(2) Highway maintenance and service equipment or vehicles owned by the
State or a local jurisdiction, or operating under a contract with the State or a local
jurisdiction, may display green flashing lights only in accordance with § 22–218(c)(6) of this
subtitle.
(3) A TOW TRUCK MAY DISPLAY A PORTABLE VARIABLE MESSAGING
SIGN ONLY IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 22–218(C)(6) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 2 –